tests/test_files/apertium-kaz.kaz.lexc
LEXICON V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<gna_impf%>:%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_pot%>:%>у%>ш%{I%} V-ADJ ;

! Gerunds
%<ger%>:%>у GER-INFL ;
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н GER-INFL ;
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_abs%>:%>у%>ш%{I%}%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н GER-POSSESSIVES ;

! Imperatives
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%>д%{A%}р CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CLIT-EMPH ;                ! Dir/LR FIXME CHECK
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з%>д%{A%}р CLIT-EMPH ;

! Optative/jussive forms
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;              ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;         ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;

!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! FIXME check
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! FIXME check

LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

LEXICON V-DER

%<coop%>:%>%{I%}с V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV-NOPASS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-TV-PASS

! e.g. көрін
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     auxiliary verbs

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF

%<vaux%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-S1 ; ! /жүр, жатыр, тұр, отыр/
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<evid%>:% екен V-PERS-S1 ; ! e.g., "жатыр екенмін"

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF-NEG

%<vaux%>%<neg%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-S1 ; ! /жатқан жоқ/
%<vaux%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<evid%>:% екен V-PERS-S1 ; ! e.g., "жатқан жоқ екенмін"

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ; ! these four verbs in other tenses and all other aux. verbs

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     copula

LEXICON Copula

е%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:екен GER-POSSESSIVES ;
е%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:екен%>%{L%}%{I%}к GER-POSSESSIVES ;

! This is an evidential aorist form, not past -JNW
е%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:екен V-PERS-S1 ;
е%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:емес% екен V-PERS-S1 ;

е%<cop%>%<ifi%>:е%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

е%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:емес V-PERS-S1 ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PRONOUN'S INFLECTION

!!!!!!!   P E R S O N A L

LEXICON PRON-P12SG-CASES

%<nom%>:ен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gen%>:енің CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:аған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:ені CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:енен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:енде CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:енімен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:еніменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<gen%>%<subst%>:енікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:ендегі ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:ендей CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<advl%>:еніңше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-P3SG-CASES

%<nom%>:л CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<gen%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:дан CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:нда CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:нымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:ныменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<gen%>%<subst%>:нікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:ндағы ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:ндай CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<advl%>:ныңша CLITICS-NO-COP ;


LEXICON PRON-PERS-INFL

CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS

мен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:м PRON-P12SG-CASES ;

сен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:с PRON-P12SG-CASES ;

ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:о PRON-P3SG-CASES ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:а PRON-P3SG-CASES ;
!ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%+үшін:аның% үшін POST ; ! Dir/LR

біз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:біз PRON-PERS-INFL ;
біз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<advl%>:біздіңше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

сендер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:сендер PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сендер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<advl%>:сендерше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

олар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:олар PRON-PERS-INFL ;
олар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<advl%>:оларша CLITICS-NO-COP ;

сіз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:сіз PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сіз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>%<advl%>:сіздіңше CLITICS-NO-COP ;
сіздер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:сіздер PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сіздер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>%<advl%>:сіздерше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

!!!!!!!   D E M O N S T R A T I V E

! FIXME CHECK (CLITICS-INCL-COP vs CLIT) I can't imagine forms like "бумын, бусың" etc.
! in Tatar, but not sure how it works in Kazakh /I.S./
!-----
! Good idea is to link prn.dem.sim forms alternatively to CLIT and CASE,
! so that it's "adverbial reading" (e.g. "шундый каты кычкырды") doesn't
! receive <nom> tag /IS/

LEXICON PRON-DEM-INFL

%<gen%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:дан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:нан CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR FIXME actually only "осы" seems to take this.
%<loc%>:нда CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>:нікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:ндагы ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:ндай CASES ;  ! FIXME: should have <det>, etc.
%<advl%>:лай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<qnt%>:нша CLITICS-NO-COP ;         !

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

! Commented out till these forms get implemented in tat.lexc too
!%<TD%>:шалық CLITICS-NO-COP ;        ! "that much"  ! FIXME: check cont lex
!%<reas%>%<abl%>:ндықтан # ; ! "because of"  ! FIXME: not attested with осы?

! FIXME: 1) link the below to PRON-DEM-INFL if possible
!            (later, once we are certain about things)

 LEXICON Verbs
былшылда:былшылда V-IV ; ! ""
айырыс:айырыс V-IV ; ! ""
қажа:қажа V-TV ; ! ""
қалғып%-мүлгі:қалғып%-мүлгі V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
айғайла:айғайла V-IV ; ! "shout,bark at someone"
айқындан:айқындан V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
айқышта:айқышта V-TV ; ! "to lay criss-cross"
аласұр:аласұр V-IV ; ! "rush about,be confused"
алмас:алмас V-TV ; ! "exchange,swap,be confused" ! FIXME CHECK TV
арала:арала V-TV ; ! "saw,walk among"
арс% ет:арс% ет V-IV ; ! ""
атыстыр:атыстыр V-TV ; ! ""
ауытқы:ауытқы V-IV ; ! "to reel"
бағыс:бағыс V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "educate,look after" (kaz tat) coop
балықты% аула:балықты% аула V-TV ; ! ""
бат:бат V-IV ; ! "погружаться,тонуть;осмелиться"
бер:бер V-TV ; ! "give"
болжам% жаса:болжам% жаса V-IV ; ! "предсказать"
босат:босат V-TV ; ! "to empty, free (from)" NOTE caus
былға:былға V-TV ; ! "пачкать,марать"
бытыс:бытыс V-IV ; ! "to get mixed"
де:де V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "speak"
де:делін V-TV-PASS ; ! "speak"
егеуле:егеуле V-TV ; ! "to file (work with a file)"
әдепсізден:әдепсізден V-IV ; ! "prove to be impolite or indecorous"
еріт:еріт V-TV ; ! "melt"
еркінде:еркінде V-IV ; ! "to feel free"
жаз:жаз V-TV ; ! "write"
жалында:жалында V-IV ; ! "to flame"
жаңғырт:жаңғырт V-TV ; ! "modernize"
желіктір:желіктір V-TV ; ! "to incite"
желпілде:желпілде V-IV ; ! 
жоқта:жоқта V-TV ; ! "наводить справки"
тазалан:тазалан V-IV ; ! ""
жылтырат:жылтырат V-TV ; ! "to illuminate" (kaz tat) ! Der/Caus
іздеттір:іздеттір V-TV ; ! "" ! Der/Caus/Caus
қабылда:қабылда V-TV-NOPASS ; ! ""
қабылда:қабылдан V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
қабын:қабын V-IV ; ! 
қайта% ал:қайта% ал V-TV ; !
қақтығыс:қақтығыс V-IV ; ! "to get into a fight" FIXME CHECK
қамтамасыз% ет:қамтамасыз% ет V-TV ; ! "provide"
қарқылда:қарқылда V-IV ; ! "to guffaw"
қарусыздандыр:қарусыздандыр V-TV ; ! 
келіс:келіс V-IV ; ! "agree"
кешір:кешір V-TV ; ! "forgive"
қондыр:қондыр V-TV ; ! "to keep a guest overnight; have a guest" (kaz tat) ! Der/Caus
көнер:көнер V-IV ; ! "to be shabby"
көр:көр V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "see"
көр:көрін V-TV-PASS ; ! "be seen"
көс:көс V-TV ; ! "shovel"
күй:күй V-IV ; ! "burn"
көңіл% ау:көңіл% ау V-TV ; ! 
қомдастыр:қомдастыр V-TV ; ! "Use/MT"
сықылда:сықылда V-TV ; !
жөндел:жөндел V-IV ; ! Der/Pass
ежелен:ежелен V-TV ; !
қылжақта:қылжақта V-TV ; !
отырғызыл:отырғызыл V-IV ; ! Der/Pass
шымш:шымш V-TV ; !
күпілде:күпілде V-IV ; ! "to rumble"
қусыр:қусыр V-TV ; ! "to twist"
қыста:қыста V-IV ; ! "to pass the winter"
лицензияла:лицензияла V-TV ; ! ""
мінезде:мінезде V-TV ; ! "to describe"
нақұрыстан:нақұрыстан V-IV ; ! "to become abnormal"
сілтеме% бойынша% тап:сілтеме% бойынша% тап V-TV ; ! ""
өзара% іс-қимылда:өзара% іс-қимылда V-IV ; ! 
өлтір:өлтір V-TV ; ! "kill,destroy" (kaz tat) ! Der/Caus
шықпырт:шықпырт V-IV ; ! 
ретте:ретте V-TV ; ! "put in order"
сауал:сауал V-IV ; ! "to recover"
сен:сен V-TV ; ! "believe"
суар:суар V-TV ; ! "water"
сүйен:сүйен V-IV ; ! "" refl?
тағайында:тағайында V-TV ; ! ""
талап% ет:талап% ет V-IV ; ! ""
аласұрт:аласұрт V-TV ; ! ""
қайнаған% сумен% күйдір:қайнаған% сумен% күйдір V-TV ; ! "Use/MT"
ақсай% бас:ақсай% бас V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
тан:тан V-IV ; ! "deny"
тасымалда:тасымалда V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "move, transfer"
тасымалда:тасымалдан V-TV-PASS ; ! "move, transfer"
тасы:тасы V-TV ; ! "haul"
жымқыр:жымқыр V-TV ; ! ""
қиратыл:қиратыл V-TV ; ! ""
күлтелен:күлтелен V-IV ; ! ""
ойып% орнатыл:ойып% орнатыл V-TV ; ! ""
сергіт:сергіт V-TV ; ! ""
тайсал:тайсал V-TV ; ! ""
жіберіл:жіберіл V-TV ; ! ""
ұшқында:ұшқында V-IV ; ! ""
естен% тан:естен% тан V-TV ; ! ""
аяқтама:аяқтама V-TV ; ! ""
аралап% шық:аралап% шық V-TV ; ! ""
кетір:кетір V-TV ; ! ""
жаншы:жаншы V-TV ; ! "mush, smash"
жарыт:жарыт V-TV ; ! ""
символмен% көрсет:символмен% көрсет V-TV ; ! ""
айқастыр:айқастыр V-TV ; ! ""
толтыр:толтыр V-IV ; ! ""
мойындама:мойындама V-IV ; ! ""
дәйек% сөз% ал:дәйек% сөз% ал V-IV ; ! ""
ұрып% жық:ұрып% жық V-IV ; ! ""
дабдыра:дабдыра V-IV ; ! ""
бұлғақтат:бұлғақтат V-IV ; ! ""
тербет:тербет V-TV ; ! "to rock"
тікіреңде:тікіреңде V-IV ; ! "to attack (someone) furiously (with one's eyes starting out of one's head)"
тілімде:тілімден V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
толықтыр:толықтыр V-TV ; ! ""
тұрақтандыр:тұрақтандыр V-TV ; !
тұр:тұр V-IV ; ! "rise,stand"
тынышталдыр:тынышталдыр V-TV ; ! 
үде:үде V-IV ; ! ""
ұрла:ұрла V-TV ; ! "steal"
шабалаңда:шабалаңда V-IV ; ! "to bark fiercely at some­thing (of a dog)" (tat) trimm
шүйгі:шүйгі V-IV ; ! "be sated"
шығарт:шығарт V-TV ; ! "to force to lead out" NOTE this is interesting - looks like caus > caus /I.S./ ! Der/Caus/Caus
жат:жатыр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
жат:жатқан% жоқ Vinfl-AUX-IMPF-NEG ; ! 
жүр:жүр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
жүр:жүрген% жоқ Vinfl-AUX-IMPF-NEG ; ! 
отыр:отыр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
отыр:отырған% жоқ Vinfl-AUX-IMPF-NEG ; ! 
тұр:тұр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
тұр:тұрған% жоқ Vinfl-AUX-IMPF-NEG ; ! 
ал:ал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
баста:баста Vinfl-AUX ; !
бер:бер Vinfl-AUX ; !
біт:біт Vinfl-AUX ; !
бітір:бітір Vinfl-AUX ; !
бол:бол Vinfl-AUX ; !
ет:ет Vinfl-AUX ; ! ""
жазда:жазда Vinfl-AUX ; !
жат:жат Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
жүр:жүр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
кел:кел Vinfl-AUX ; !
кет:кет Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
көр:көр Vinfl-AUX ; !
қал:қал Vinfl-AUX ; !
қой:қой Vinfl-AUX ; !
отыр:отыр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
сал:сал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
тұр:тұр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
шық:шық Vinfl-AUX ; !
керек:керек Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! "  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
жатыр:жатыр Vinfl-AUX ; ! "  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
сырғана:сырғана V-IV ; ! "slip"  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
таразыла:таразыла V-TV ; ! ""
тәрізден:тәрізден V-IV ; ! ""
ағытыл:ағытыл V-IV ; ! ""
кіріс:кіріс V-IV ; ! ""
тікірей:тікірей V-IV ; ! ""
елегіз:елегіз V-IV ; ! ""
ренжі:ренжі V-IV ; ! ""
дөңгелектен:дөңгелектен V-IV ; ! ""
жойылып% кет:жойылып% кет V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
есептеспе:есептеспе V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
аса% тол:аса% тол V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
өтіп% кет:өтіп% кет V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
бой% тасалат:бой% тасалат V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
қаттырақ% кет:қаттырақ% кет V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
зәресі% ұш:зәресі% ұш V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
көрсетіл:көрсетіл V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
тексерткіз:тексерткіз V-TV ; ! "Use/MT"
реттел:реттел V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
бөлшектен:бөлшектен V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
істеп% шығар:істеп% шығар V-TV ; ! "Use/MT"
қарғыт:қарғыт V-TV ; ! "Use/MT"
